hu: Doromb tartozékok a csomagban: Hordozótok; Törlőkendő; Használati útmutató füzet; Hozzáférés online leckékhez; Tasak; Pótnyelv (reed); Hangolószerszám; Egyéb
zh-TW: 包含口簧琴配件: 收納盒; 清潔布; 說明手冊; 線上課程存取權; 收納袋; 備用簧片; 調音工具; 其他
ko: 주즈하프 액세서리 포함: 휴대용 케이스; 클리닝 천; 설명서; 온라인 레슨 이용권; 파우치; 여분 텅(리드); 튜닝 도구; 기타
it: Accessori inclusi per lo scacciapensieri: Custodia per il trasporto; Panno per la pulizia; Libretto di istruzioni; Accesso a lezioni online; Sacchetto; Linguetta di ricambio (ancia); Attrezzo per l'accordatura; Altro
es: Accesorios incluidos del arpa de boca: Estuche de transporte; Paño de limpieza; Folleto de instrucciones; Acceso a clases online; Funda; Lengüeta de repuesto; Herramienta de afinación; Otro
sv: Munharpa – tillbehör som medföljer: Bärväska; Putsduk; Instruktionshäfte; Tillgång till onlinelektion; Fodral; Reservtunga; Stämverktyg; Annat
pl: Dołączono akcesoria drumli: Etui; Ściereczka do czyszczenia; Broszura z instrukcją; Dostęp do lekcji online; Pokrowiec; Zapasowy języczek (stroik); Narzędzie do strojenia; Inne
fi: Munniharpun mukana tulevat lisävarusteet: Kantolaukku; Puhdistusliina; Ohjekirja; Pääsy online-oppitunneille; Pussi; Varakieli; Viritystyökalu; Muu
pt-BR: Acessórios inclusos na harpa de boca: Estojo de transporte; Pano de limpeza; Livreto de instruções; Acesso a aulas online; Bolsa; Lingueta de reposição (palheta); Ferramenta de afinação; Outros
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за устна арфа: Калъф за носене; Кърпа за почистване; Книжка с инструкции; Достъп до онлайн уроци; Торбичка; Резервно езиче (пластина); Инструмент за настройка; Друго
zh-CN: 包括口弦琴配件: 便携包; 清洁布; 说明书; 在线课程访问权限; 收纳袋; 备用弹片（簧片）; 调音工具; 其他
de: Maultrommelzubehör inklusive: Tragetasche; Reinigungstuch; Anleitungsheft; Zugang zu Online-Lektionen; Beutel; Ersatzzunge (Blatt); Stimmwerkzeug; Sonstige
fr: Accessoires pour guimbarde inclus: Étui de transport; Chiffon de nettoyage; Livret d’instructions; Accès à des cours en ligne; Pochette; Languette de rechange; Outil de réglage; Autre
ro-RO: Accesorii pentru drâmbă incluse: Casetă de transport; Lavetă de curățare; Manual de instrucțiuni; Acces la lecții online; Săculeț; Lamelă de rezervă; Instrument de acordare; Altele
sk-SK: Vrátane príslušenstva k drumbli: Puzdro na prenášanie; Čistiaca handrička; Brožúra s pokynmi; Prístup k online lekciám; Vrecúško; Náhradný jazýček; Nástroj na ladenie; Iné
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับฮาร์ปปากที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: เคสพกพา; ผ้าทำความสะอาด; คู่มือแนะนำ; สิทธิ์เข้าถึงบทเรียนออนไลน์; กระเป๋าใส่; ลิ้นอะไหล่; เครื่องมือปรับเสียง; อื่นๆ
ru: Аксессуары варгана: Чехол для переноски; Салфетка для чистки; Буклет с инструкцией; Доступ к онлайн-урокам; Мешочек; Запасной язычок; Инструмент для настройки; Другое
cs: Včetně příslušenství k ústní harfě: Přepravní pouzdro; Čisticí hadřík; Brožura s pokyny; Přístup k online lekci; Sáček; Náhradní jazýček; Ladící nástroj; Jiné
da: Jødeharpetilbehør medfølger: Bæretaske; Pudseklud; Instruktionshæfte; Adgang til online lektioner; Opbevaringspose; Ekstra tunge (blad); Stemmeværktøj; Andet
en: Jew harp accessories included: Carrying case; Cleaning cloth; Instruction booklet; Online lesson access; Pouch; Spare tongue (reed); Tuning tool; Other
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za dromljo: Kovček za prenašanje; Krpa za čiščenje; Knjižica z navodili; Dostop do spletnih lekcij; Torbica; Rezervni jeziček; Orodje za uglasitev; Drugo
pt-PT: Acessórios do berimbau incluídos: Estojo de transporte; Pano de limpeza; Folheto de instruções; Acesso a aulas online; Bolsa; Língua (palheta) sobresselente; Ferramenta de afinação; Outro
tr: Ağız mızıkası aksesuarları dahildir.: Taşıma çantası; Temizleme bezi; Kullanım kitapçığı; Online ders erişimi; Kese; Yedek dil; Akort aleti; Diğer
ja: 口琴アクセサリー付き: キャリングケース; クリーニングクロス; 取扱説明書; オンラインレッスンへのアクセス; ポーチ; 予備の弁（リード）; チューニングツール; その他
nb: Inkludert tilbehør til munnharpe: Bæreveske; Pusseklut; Instruksjonshefte; Tilgang til online leksjoner; Pose; Ekstra tunge (rørblad); Stemmeverktøy; Annet
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ άρπας στόματος: Θήκη μεταφοράς; Πανάκι καθαρισμού; Φυλλάδιο οδηγιών; Πρόσβαση σε διαδικτυακά μαθήματα; Τσαντάκι; Εφεδρική γλώσσα (καλάμι); Εργαλείο χορδίσματος; Άλλο
vi: Phụ kiện đàn môi đi kèm: Hộp đựng; Khăn lau; Sách hướng dẫn; Truy cập bài học trực tuyến; Túi nhỏ; Lưỡi gà dự phòng; Dụng cụ lên dây; Khác
nl: Inbegrepen accessoires mondharp: Draagtas; Schoonmaakdoekje; Instructieboekje; Toegang tot online lessen; Buideltje; Reserve-tong (riet); Stemgereedschap; Overig
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys dambrelio priedai: Nešiojimo dėklas; Valymo šluostė; Instrukcijų knygelė; Prieiga prie pamokų internete; Maišelis; Atsarginis liežuvėlis; Derinimo įrankis; Kita
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za židovsku harfu: Torbica za nošenje; Krpica za čišćenje; Knjižica s uputama; Pristup mrežnim lekcijama; Vrećica; Rezervni jezičak; Alat za ugađanje; Ostalo